North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-4.
(Effective until January 1, 2022) Creditable service.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-29, s. 1(a), effective June 19, 2020.

In no case shall more than one year of service be creditable for all services in one year. Service rendered for the regular school year in any district shall be equivalent to one year’s service. Service rendered by a school employee in a job-sharing position
shall be credited at the rate of one-half year for each regular school year of employment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-85, s. 7, effective June 25, 2018.

Any member may, up to his date of retirement and within one year thereafter, request the Board of Trustees to modify or correct service credit that was earned prior to retirement.

Creditable service at retirement on which the retirement allowance of a member shall be based shall consist of the membership service rendered by the member since he or she last became a member, and also if the member has a prior service certificate which
is in full force and effect, the amount of service certified on the prior service certificate; and if the member has sick leave standing to the member’s credit upon retirement on or after July 1, 1971, one month of credit for each
20 days or portion thereof, but not less than one hour; sick leave shall not be counted in computing creditable service for the purpose of determining eligibility for disability retirement or for a vested deferred allowance. Creditable
service for unused sick leave shall be allowed only for sick leave accrued monthly during employment under a duly adopted sick leave policy and for which the member may be able to take credits and be paid for sick leave without
restriction. However, in no instance shall unused sick leave be credited to a member’s account at retirement if the member’s last day of actual service is more than five years prior to the effective date of the member’s retirement.
Further, any agency with a sick leave policy that is more generous than that of all State agencies subject to the rules of the Office of State Human Resources shall proportionately adjust each of its retiring employees’ sick leave
balance to the balance that employee would have had under the rules of the Office of State Human Resources. Days of sick leave standing to a member’s credit at retirement shall be determined by dividing the member’s total hours
of sick leave at retirement by the hours per month such leave was awarded under the employer’s duly adopted sick leave policy as the policy applied to the member when the leave was accrued.

(e1)
The creditable service of a member who was a member of the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System at the time of the transfer of law-enforcement officers employed by the State from that System to this Retirement
System and whose accumulated contributions are transferred from that System to this Retirement System, shall include service that was creditable in the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System; and membership service with
that System shall be membership service with this Retirement System; provided, notwithstanding any provision of this Article to the contrary, any inchoate or accrued rights of such a member to purchase creditable service for
military service, withdrawn service and prior service under the rules and regulations of the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System shall not be diminished and may be purchased as creditable service with this Retirement
System under the same conditions which would have otherwise applied.

Armed Service Credit. —

Teachers and other State employees who entered the Armed Forces of the United States on or after September 16, 1940, and prior to February 17, 1941, and who returned to the service of the State within a period of two years after they were first eligible
to be separated or released from the Armed Forces of the United States under other than dishonorable conditions shall be entitled to full credit for all prior service. Pursuant to 38 U.S.C. § 4318(b)(1), when a member who
has been on military leave returns to work consistent with the provisions of this subdivision, then the member’s employer must remit to the System all the employer contributions for the full period of that member’s military
service.

Teachers and other State employees who entered the Armed Forces of the United States on or after September 16, 1940, and who returned to the service of the State prior to October 1, 1952, or who devote not less than 10 years of service to the State after
they are separated or released from the Armed Forces of the United States under other than dishonorable conditions, shall be entitled to full credit for all prior service, and, in addition they shall receive membership
service credit for the period of service in the Armed Forces of the United States up to the date they were first eligible to be separated or released therefrom, occurring after the date of establishment of the Retirement
System.

Teachers and other State employees who enter the Armed Forces of the United States on or after July 1, 1950, or who engage in active military service on or after July 1, 1950, and who return to the service of the State within a period of two years after
they are first eligible to be separated or released from such active military service under other than dishonorable conditions shall be entitled to full membership service credit for the period of such active service in
the Armed Forces of the United States.

Under such rules as the Board of Trustees shall adopt, credit will be provided by the Retirement System with respect to each such teacher or other State employee in the amounts that he or she would have been paid during such service in the Armed Forces
of the United States on the basis of his or her earnable compensation when such service commenced. Such contributions shall be credited to the individual account of the member in the annuity savings fund, in such manner
as the Board of Trustees shall determine, but any such contributions so credited and any regular interest thereon shall be available to the member only in the form of an annuity, or benefit in lieu thereof, upon the member’s
retirement on a service, disability or special retirement allowance; and in the event of cessation of membership or death prior thereto, any such contributions so credited and regular interest thereon shall not be payable
to the member or on the member’s account, but shall be transferred from the annuity savings fund to the pension accumulation fund. If any payments were made by a member on account of such service as provided by subdivision
(5) of subsection (b) of

G.S. 135-8

, the Board of Trustees shall refund to or reimburse such member for such payments.

The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to members of the North Carolina National Guard with respect to teachers and State employees who are called into federal service or who are called into State service, to the extent that such persons fail
to receive compensation for performance of the duties of their employment other than for service in the North Carolina National Guard.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 636, s. 1. For proviso as to inchoate or accrued rights, see Editor’s note below.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, any member and any retired member as herein described may purchase creditable service in the Armed Forces of the United States, not otherwise allowed, by paying a total lump sum payment determined as
follows:

For members who completed 10 years of membership service, and retired members who completed 10 years of membership service prior to retirement, whose membership began on or prior to July 1, 1981, and who make this purchase within three years after first
becoming eligible, the cost shall be an amount equal to the monthly compensation the member earned when the member first entered membership service times the employee contribution rate at that time times the months
of service to be purchased, multiplied by a factor equivalent to the investment return assumptions determined by the Board of Trustees, compounded annually, from the initial year of membership to the year of payment
so as to equal one-half of the cost of allowing this service, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees.

For members who complete five years of membership service, and retired members who complete five years of membership service prior to retirement, and eligible members and retired members covered by paragraph a. of this subdivision, whose membership began
on or before July 1, 1981, but who did not or do not make this purchase within three years after first becoming eligible, the cost shall be an amount equal to the full liability of the service credits calculated
on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the System’s liabilities and shall take into account the retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credits
commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced allowance, as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by
the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits, the term “full liability” includes assumed post-retirement allowance increases,
as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service retirement allowance.Creditable service allowed under this subdivision shall be only for the initial
period of “active duty”, as defined in 38 U.S. Code Section 101(21), in the Armed Forces of the United States up to the date the member was first eligible to be separated and released and for subsequent periods
of “active duty”, as defined in 38 U.S. Code Section 101(21), as required by the Armed Forces of the United States up to the date of first eligibility for separation or release, but shall not include periods of
active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States creditable in any other retirement system except the National Guard or any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, and shall not include periods
of “active duty for training”, as defined in 38 U.S. Code Section 101(22), or periods of “inactive duty training”, as defined in 38 U.S. Code Section 101(23), rendered in any reserve component of the Armed Forces
of the United States. Provided, creditable service may be allowed only for active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States of a member that resulted in a general or honorable discharge from duty. The member
shall submit satisfactory evidence of the service claimed. For purposes of this subsection, membership service may include any membership or prior service credits transferred to this Retirement System pursuant to

G.S. 135-18.1

.

Teachers and other State employees who served in the uniformed services as defined in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4303, who were not dishonorably discharged, and who returned to the service of the
State within a period of two years from date of discharge shall be credited with prior service for such period of service in the uniformed services for the maximum period that they are entitled to reemployment under the Uniformed
Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4301, et seq., or other federal law, and the salary or compensation of such a teacher or State employee during that period of service is deemed to be that salary
or compensation the employee would have received but for the period of service had the employee remained continuously employed, if the determination of that salary or compensation is reasonably certain. If the determination of
the salary or compensation is not reasonably certain, then it is deemed to be that employee’s average rate of compensation during the 12-month period immediately preceding the period of service. When a member who has served in
the uniformed services returns to work in compliance with the conditions of this subsection, that member’s employer shall remit to the System all employer and employee contributions for the full period of that member’s military
service.

During periods when a member is on leave of absence and is receiving less than the member’s full compensation, the member will be deemed to be in service only if the member is contributing to the Retirement System as provided in G.S. 135-8(b)(5). If the
member is so contributing, the annual rate of compensation paid to such employee immediately before the leave of absence began will be deemed to be the actual compensation rate of the employee during the leave of absence.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-29, s. 1(a), effective June 19, 2020.

Creditable service at retirement shall include any service rendered by a member while on leave of absence to serve as a member or officer of the General Assembly which is not creditable toward retirement under the Legislative Retirement Fund provided
the allowance of such credit shall be contingent upon the cancellation of service credit in the Fund and the transfer of the member’s contributions plus accumulated interest from the Fund to this System.

(j1)
Any member may purchase creditable service for service as a member of the General Assembly not otherwise creditable under this section, provided the service is not credited in the Legislative Retirement Fund nor
the Legislative Retirement System, and further provided the member pays a lump sum amount equal to the full cost of the additional service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial
valuation of the System’s liabilities, taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credits commencing at the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced
retirement allowance as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection
that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the
earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

(j2)
The creditable service of a member who was a member of the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System, and whose accumulated
contributions and reserves are transferred from that System to this System, includes service that was creditable in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, or the Legislative
Retirement System, and membership service with those Retirement Systems is membership service with this Retirement System.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, on or before December 31, 2021, any person who withdrew his or her contributions in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 128-27(f) or G.S. 135-5(f) or the rules and regulations of the Law-Enforcement
Officers’ Retirement System and who subsequently returns to service may, upon completion of five years of membership service, repay in a total lump sum any and all of the accumulated contributions previously withdrawn with interest
compounded annually at the rate of six and one-half percent (6.5%) for each calendar year from the year of withdrawal to the year of repayment plus a fee to cover expense of handling which shall be determined by the Board of Trustees,
and receive credit for the service forfeited at time of withdrawal. These provisions shall apply equally to retired members who had attained five years of membership service prior to retirement. The retirement allowance of a retired
member who restores service under this subsection shall be increased the month following the month payment is received. The increase in the retirement allowance shall be the difference between the initial retirement allowance,
under any optional allowance elected at the time of retirement, and the amount of the retirement allowance, under any optional allowance elected at the time of retirement, to which the retired member would have been entitled had
the service not been previously forfeited, adjusted by any increases in the retirement accrual rate occurring between the member’s date of retirement and the date of payment. The increase in the retirement allowance shall not include
any adjustment for cost-of-living increases granted since the date of retirement.Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, on or before December 31, 2021, a law enforcement officer who was transferred from the Law Enforcement
Officers’ Retirement System to this Retirement System pursuant to Article 12C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and withdrew his or her accumulated contributions prior to January 1, 1985, in accordance with G.S. 128-27(f)
or G.S. 135-5(f) for non-law enforcement service and who has five years or more of membership service standing to his or her credit may repay in a total lump sum the accumulated contributions previously withdrawn with interest
compounded annually at the rate of six and one-half percent (6.5%) for each calendar year from the year of withdrawal to the year of repayment plus a fee to cover expense of handling which shall be determined by the Board of Trustees,
and receive credit for the service forfeited at time of withdrawal(s). The retirement allowance of a retired member who restores service under this subsection shall be increased the month following the month payment is received.
The increase in the retirement allowance shall be the difference between the initial retirement allowance, under any optional allowance elected at the time of retirement, and the amount of the retirement allowance, under any optional
allowance elected at the time of retirement, to which the retired member would have been entitled had the service not been previously forfeited, adjusted by any increases in the retirement accrual rate occurring between the member’s
date of retirement and the date of payment. The increase in the retirement allowance shall not include any adjustment for cost-of-living increases granted since the date of retirement.

(k1)

North Carolina Withdrawn Service Purchased On and After January 1, 2022. —
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter to the contrary, on and after January 1, 2022, any member who withdrew his or her contributions in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 127-27(f) or G.S. 135-5(f)
or the rules and regulations of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System, and who subsequently returns to service and completes five years of membership service upon that return, while in service may purchase an amount
of creditable service totaling the amount of the membership service associated with the withdrawn contributions, provided that the total of the creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed five years. The
member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of
the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member
could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall
also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase
is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s
annuity savings account.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 636, s. 1. For proviso as to inchoate or accrued rights, see Editor’s note below.

(
l
1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, on or before December 31, 2021, any member and any retired member as herein described may purchase creditable service previously rendered to the federal government
or to any state, territory, or other governmental subdivision of the United States other than this State by paying a total lump-sum payment determined as follows:

For members who completed 10 years of current membership service, and retired members who completed 10 years of current membership service prior to retirement, whose membership began on or before July 1, 1981, and who make such purchase within three years
after first becoming eligible, the cost shall be an amount equal to the monthly compensation the member earned when the member first entered membership service, times the employee contribution rate at that time, times the
months of service to be purchased, times two, multiplied by a factor equivalent to the investment return assumptions determined by the Board of Trustees, compounded annually, from the initial year of membership to the year
of payment so as to equal the full cost of allowing such service, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees.

For members who complete five years of current membership service, and retired members who complete five years of current membership service prior to retirement, and eligible members and retired members covered by subdivision (1) of this subsection, whose
membership began on or before July 1, 1981, but who did not or do not make such purchase within three years after first becoming eligible, the cost shall be an amount equal to the full liability of the service credits calculated
on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the System’s liabilities and shall take into account the retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credits commencing
at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced allowance, as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits, the term “full liability” includes assumed postretirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of
Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service retirement allowance. Notwithstanding the requirement of five years of current membership service, a member whose membership began prior
to the service the member desires to purchase shall be eligible to purchase creditable service under this subdivision upon returning to service as a teacher or employee upon completion of a total of five years of membership
service and upon completion of one year of current membership service.Current membership service shall mean membership service earned since the service previously rendered to any state, territory, or other governmental
subdivision of the United States other than this State. Creditable service under this subsection shall be allowed only at the rate of one year of out-of-state service for each year of membership service in this State, with
a maximum allowable of 10 years of out-of-state service. Such service is limited to full-time service which would be allowable under the laws governing this System. Credit will be allowed only if no benefit is allowable
in another public retirement system as a result of the service.

(
l
2)
Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, on and after January 1, 2021, any member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase creditable service previously
rendered to the federal government or to any state, territory, or other governmental subdivision of the United States other than this State by paying a total lump sum payment. The amount of creditable service purchased
under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service
credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance
shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon
the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Creditable service under this subsection shall be allowed only at the rate
of one year of out-of-state service for each year of membership service in this State, with a maximum allowable of five years of out-of-state service. Such service is limited to full-time service that would be allowable
under the laws governing this Retirement System. Credit will be allowed only if no benefit is allowable in another public retirement system as a result of the service.Subject to the requirements of this subsection,
an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation
fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

Notwithstanding any language to the contrary of any provision of this section, or of any repealed provision of this section that was repealed with the inchoate and accrued rights preserved, all repayments and purchases of service credits, allowed under
the provisions of this section or of any repealed provision of this section that was repealed with inchoate and accrued rights preserved, must be made within three years after the member first becomes eligible to make such repayments
and purchases. Any member who does not repay or purchase service credits within said three years after first eligibility to make such repayments and purchases may, under the same conditions as are otherwise required, repay or purchase
service credits provided that the repayment or purchase equals the full cost of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the system’s liabilities and shall take
into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of such additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which such member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance as determined by the Board
of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost”
include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance. Notwithstanding the foregoing, on and after
July 1, 2001, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the repayment of contributions withdrawn pursuant to subsection (k) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 636, s. 1. For proviso as to inchoate or accrued rights, see Editor’s note below.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 636, s. 1. For proviso as to inchoate or accrued rights, see Editor’s note below.

Credit for prior temporary State employment. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, on or before December 31, 2021, a member may purchase service credit for temporary State employment upon completion of 10 years of membership service
and subject to the condition that the member had been classified as a temporary employee for more than three years. Each employer shall certify to the Board of Trustees that an employee is eligible to purchase this service credit
prior to the member making payment. Payment for the service credit shall be in a single lump sum based upon the amount the member would have contributed if he had been properly classified as a permanent employee and been a member
of this retirement system.

(p1) Repealed by Session Laws 2020-29, s. 1(a), effective June 19, 2020.

(p2) Part-Time Service Credit. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter to the contrary, any member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase service previously rendered as a part-time teacher or employee of an
employer, as defined in

G.S. 135-1(11)

or

G.S. 128-21(11)

, except the following service may not be purchased:

Part-time service rendered as a bus driver to a public school while a full-time high school student.

Temporary or part-time service rendered while a full-time student in pursuit of a degree or diploma in a degree-granting program, unless that service was rendered on a permanent part-time basis and required at least 20 hours of service per week.Payment
for service purchased under this subsection shall be made in a single lump sum in an amount calculated by applying the ratio of actual gross compensation earned as a part-time employee to the gross compensation that would
have been earned as a full-time employee to the period of service rendered in months. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due
to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation:
(i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of
Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.The Board of Trustees shall adopt rules regarding how much service
in any year, as based on compensation, is equivalent to one year of service in proportion to earnable compensation, but in no case shall more than one year of service be creditable for all service in one year. Service rendered
for the regular school year in any district shall be equivalent to one year of service.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service.
To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member
shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-29, s. 1(a), effective June 19, 2020.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, any member may purchase creditable service for periods of employer approved leaves of absence when in receipt of benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act. This service shall be purchased
by paying a cost calculated in the following manner:

Leaves of Absence Terminated Prior to July 1, 1983. — The cost to a member whose employer approved leave of absence, when in receipt of benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, terminated upon return to service prior to July 1, 1983,
shall be a lump sum amount payable to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the system’s liabilities,
and shall take into account the retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance, as determined
by the board of trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the board of trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subdivision that provide for the purchase
of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a
member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

Leaves of Absence Terminating On and After July 1, 1983, but before January 1, 1988. — The cost to a member whose employer approved leave of absence, when in receipt of benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, terminates upon return
to service on and after July 1, 1983, but before January 1, 1988, shall be a lump sum amount due and payable to the Annuity Savings Fund within six months from return to service equal to the total employee and employer
percentage rates of contribution in effect at the time of purchase and based on the annual rate of compensation of the member immediately prior to the leave of absence; Provided, however, the cost to a member whose amount
due is not paid within six months from return to service shall be the amount due plus one percent (1%) per month penalty for each month or fraction thereof the payment is made beyond the six-month period.

Leaves of Absence Terminating On and After January 1, 1988. — The cost to a member whose employer approved leave of absence, when in receipt of benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, terminates on and after January 1, 1988, shall
be due and payable to the Annuity Savings Fund within six months from end of the leave of absence and shall be a lump sum amount equal to the employee percentage rate of contribution in effect at the time of purchase applied
to the annual rate of compensation of the member immediately prior to the leave of absence. For members electing to make this payment, the member’s employer which granted the leave of absence, or the member’s employer upon
a return to service, or both, shall make a matching lump sum payment to the Pension Accumulation Fund within six months from the end of the leave of absence equal to the employer percentage rate of contribution in effect
at the time of purchase applied to the annual rate of compensation of the member immediately prior to the leave of absence. Such purchases of creditable service are applicable only when members have membership service credits
within 30 days prior to the leave of absence and within 12 months following the leave of absence and such membership service is creditable service at the time of purchase. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision,
the cost to a member and to a member’s employer or former employer or both employers whose amount due is not paid within six months from return to service shall be the amount due plus one percent (1%) per month penalty
for each month or fraction thereof that the payment is made after the six-month period.A member who is in receipt of Workers’ Compensation during the period for which he or she would have otherwise been eligible to receive
short-term benefits as provided in

G.S. 135-105

and who subsequently becomes a beneficiary in receipt of a benefit as provided in

G.S. 135-106

may purchase creditable service for any period of employer approved leave of absence when in receipt of benefits under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act. The cost to purchase such creditable
service shall be as determined above provided the amount due if not paid within six months from the beginning of the long-term disability period as determined in

G.S. 135-106

shall be the amount due plus one percent (1%) per month penalty for each month or fraction thereof that the payment is made after the six-month period.Whenever the creditable service purchased pursuant
to this subsection is for a period that occurs during the four consecutive calendar years that would have produced the highest average annual compensation pursuant to

G.S. 135-1(5)

had the member not been on leave of absence without pay, then the compensation that the member would have received during the purchased period shall be included in calculating the member’s average final
compensation. In such cases, the compensation that the member would have received during the purchased period shall be based on the annual rate of compensation of the member immediately prior to the leave of absence.

Credit at Full Cost for Temporary Employment. — Any member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase creditable service for State employment when classified as a temporary teacher or employee subject to all of the following
conditions:

The member was employed by an employer as defined in

G.S. 135-1(11)

or

G.S. 128-21(11)

.

The member’s temporary employment met all other requirements of

G.S. 135-1(10)

or (25), or

G.S. 128-21(10)

.

The member has completed five years or more of membership service.

The member has acquired from the employer such certifications of temporary employment as are required by the Board of Trustees.The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years. A member shall purchase
this service by making a lump sum payment into the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation
of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced
retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative
fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer,
the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

, (u) Repealed by Session Laws 2020-29, s. 1(a), effective June 19, 2020.

(v) Omitted Membership Service. — A member who had service as an employee as defined in

G.S. 135-1(10)

and

G.S. 128-21(10)

or as a teacher as defined in

G.S. 135-1(25)

and who was omitted from contributing membership through error may be allowed membership service, after submitting clear and convincing evidence of the error, as follows:

Within 90 days of the omission, by the payment of employee and employer contributions that would have been paid; or
